Nevada, session 83, AB321.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4.5. Chapter 209 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Director may establish, in coordination with the Division
of Forestry of the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources, a transitional housing program to provide training in
forestry management and conservation for offenders who:
1. Are committed to the custody of the Department and
eligible for assignment to an institution or facility of minimum
security pursuant to the provisions of NRS 209.481; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. Have previously been denied parole solely due to a lack of
other available transitional housing.
Sec. 5. Chapter 472 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The State Forester Firewarden shall establish a hiring
program to provide a pathway to hire for firefighting positions
within this State. Under the hiring program, the State Forester
Firewarden may appoint a person to fill a position in the classified
service as a firefighter with the Division of Forestry of the State
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources if the person:
(a) Was a former offender assigned to work in a program for
operating conservation camps established pursuant to NRS
209.457 and performed work relating to firefighting;
(b) Successfully completed the training necessary to prepare
the offenders assigned to the conservation camp to assist in
firefighting pursuant to NRS 209.457;
(c) Has obtained any certifications required for employment as
a firefighter with the Division of Forestry; and
(d) Meets any other qualifications established by the State
Forester Firewarden.
2. The State Forester Firewarden may adopt regulations to
carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)